Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1077.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1403.2. Commission on Children's Vision.--(a) The Commission on Children's Vision is established . as a departmental administrative commission under the concurrent authority of the Department of Education and the Department of Health with all the powers and duties generally vested in and imposed upon the commissions under the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929." <--12345678910111213141516171819 (b) The commission shall be administratively housed within the Department of Education and the Department of Health . and shall be staffed and supported by the Department of Education and the Department of Health as provided under this section.(c) In order for the commission to fulfill its duties and exercise its authority under this section:(1) An agreement shall be executed between the Department of Education, the Department of Health and the commission, which shall define and delineate the role and responsibility of each agency in assisting the commission in fulfilling its duties under this section.(2) The Department of Education, the Department of Health and the commission shall cooperate in the use of staff, land, building, quarters, facilities and equipment.(d) (C) The commission shall consist of the following members:(1) The Secretary of Education, or a designee. (2) The Secretary of Health, or a designee.(3) No less than twelve vision care professionals that work for local nonprofit organizations that provide eyeglasses to children in this Commonwealth, who shall be jointly appointed by the Secretary of Education and Secretary of Health.(e) To the extent practicable, from members initially appointed under subsection (d)(3), an equal number shall draw lots to serve for a term of three years, for a term of two years and for a term of one year. Thereafter, all members under subsection (d)(3) shall be appointed for a term of three years. Each member under subsection (d)(3) shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed.(f) The ch airperson of the commission shall rotate on an 20250HB1077PN3089 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 annual basis between the Secretary of Education or the Secretary of Health, with the Secretary of Education chairing the first annual rotation.(g) The commission shall keep a record of its official actions and may perform acts and implement policies, procedures and guidelines as may be necessary.(3) THE CHIEF OF THE DIVISION OF THE SCHOOL HEALTH PROGRAM WITHIN THE BUREAU OF COMMUNITY HEALTH SYSTEMS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH, OR A DESIGNEE.(4) NO LESS THAN THREE SCHOOL NURSES, REPRESENTING URBAN, RURAL AND SUBURBAN SCHOOL DISTRICTS, WHO SHALL BE JOINTLY APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION AND THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH.(5) NO FEWER THAN SIX VISION CARE PROFESSIONALS REPRESENTING DIVERSE SPECIALTIES, INCLUDING PEDIATRIC PROVIDERS, WHO SHALL BE JOINTLY APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY OF EDUCATION AND SECRETARY OF HEALTH.(6) REPRESENTATIVES FROM COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS THAT CONNECT CHILDREN TO EYEGLASSES.(D) THE COMMISSION SHALL ELECT A MEMBER TO SERVE AS CHAIRPERSON OF THE COMMISSION.(h) (E) The commission shall hold its first meeting within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this subsection.(i) (F) The commission shall hold meetings at the call of the chairperson.(j) (G) The members of the commission may not receive compensation or reimbursement for their service.(k) The General Assembly shall provide administrative support, meeting space and other assistance required by the commission to carry out its duties under this section in 20250HB1077PN3089 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cooperation with the Department of Education and Department of Health. The Department of Education and the Department of Health shall provide the commission with data, research and other information upon request by the commission.(H) THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL PROVIDE THE COMMISSION WITH DATA, RESEARCH AND OTHER INFORMATION UPON REQUEST BY THE COMMISSION. THE INFORMATION PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT CONTAIN CONFIDENTIAL OR PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION.(l) (I) The commission shall have all of the following powers and duties:(1) W ork with vision care professionals in this Commonwealth in developing a Statewide plan to provide follow-up vision examinations and glasses EYEGLASSES to all children STUDENTS who need follow-up vision examinations and glasses EYEGLASSES in this Commonwealth.(2) Develop a model for Statewide programs to provide vision screenings, eye examinations, follow-up eye examinations and glasses EYEGLASSES to students who need them for little to no cost to students and families.(3) Provide support and coordination for Statewide and local activities regarding the programs under clause (2).(4) Review DATA AND RESEARCH and make findings and recommendations related to children's vision care in this Commonwealth.(5) Consult with and utilize experts to assist in carrying out the duties under this subsection.(6) Investigate, review and issue an annual report on the status of the programs under clause (2) as required under subsection (m).20250HB1077PN3089 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (m) By December 31 each year, the commission shall submit a report to the Governor of the General Assembly on the status of children's access to eye examinations and glasses in this Commonwealth. The report shall include all of the following:(6) BY DECEMBER 31 OF THE FIRST FULL CALENDAR YEAR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, SUBMIT A REPORT ON THE STATUS OF CHILDREN'S ACCESS TO EYE EXAMINATIONS AND EYEGLASSES IN THIS COMMONWEALTH TO THE GOVERNOR, PRESIDENT PRO TEMPORE OF THE SENATE, MINORITY LEADER OF THE SENATE, SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE, CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE EDUCATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND CHAIR AND MINORITY CHAIR OF THE HEALTH COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES. THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:(1) Outline (I) AN OUTLINE OF Statewide programs that provide vision screenings, eye examinations, follow-up eye examinations and glasses EYEGLASSES to students who need them and their achievements . (2) Assess (II) AN ASSESSMENT OF the trends and needs in school entities regarding students who need glasses EYEGLASSES and do not have glasses EYEGLASSES . (3) Make programming (III) PROGRAMMING recommendations to help more children who need glasses EYEGLASSES receive them. (4) Highlight new initiatives and recommend future needs for Statewide programs that provide vision screenings, eye examinations, follow-up eye examinations and glasses to students.(5) Make (IV) AN OUTLINE OF NEW INITIATIVES IMPLEMENTED BY 20250HB1077PN3089 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROGRAMS THAT PROVIDE VISION SCREENINGS, EYE EXAMINATIONS AND EYEGLASSES TO STUDENTS AND NOTE ANTICIPATED FURTHER NEEDS FOR THESE PROGRAMS.(V) POLICY recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly regarding legislative or regulatory changes to improve children's access to glasses EYEGLASSES . (n) The Department of Education and the Department of Health shall provide staff to assist the commission with the commission's duties. The Department of Education and the Department of Health shall assign an executive director of the commission who shall oversee elementary and secondary students' glasses needs in this Commonwealth and serve as the director of outreach for the commission and staff who may be employed on or after the effective date of this subsection.(J) THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SHALL PROVIDE STAFF SUPPORT TO THE COMMISSION AS DETERMINED BY THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH.(K) EVERY SIX YEARS, THE COMMISSION SHALL BE RECONSTITUTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) AND SHALL MEET AND HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS TO REVIEW THE STATUS OF CHILDREN'S ACCESS TO VISION SCREENING, EYE EXAMINATIONS AND EYEGLASSES IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, MAKE A FURTHER REPORT AND ISSUE THE REPORT TO RECIPIENTS LISTED UNDER SUBSECTION (I)(6).(o) (L) The implementation of this section shall be subject to money appropriated by the General Assembly to the Department of Education or the Department of Health, and the money shall be used to carry out the purposes of this section. The Department of Education and the Department of Health may accept grants and donations from all public and private sources, including the Federal Government, to pay for costs incurred for the implementation and continuance of the provisions of this 20250HB1077PN3089 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section.(p) (M) The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless context clearly indicates otherwise: "Commission." The Commission for Children's Vision established under this section. "School entity." Any A public school, including a charter school or cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or , area career and technical school , PRIVATE SCHOOL OR NONPUBLIC SCHOOL . Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1077PN3089 - 7 - <--<--<--<--1234567891011